Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1730
Contract changes authorized.

A design-build contract and a construction manager-general contractor contract may be conditioned upon later refinements in scope and price and may permit the commission in agreement with the design-builder or construction manager to make changes in the project without invalidating the contract.

Laws 2018, LB775, § 31.